Utah statutes.
53A-1-403.5.   Education of persons in custody of the Utah Department of
Corrections -- Contracting for services -- Recidivism reduction plan --
Collaboration among state agencies -- Annual report.
(1)  The State Board of Education, the State Board of Regents, and the Utah
Department of Corrections, subject to legislative appropriation, are
responsible for the education of persons in the custody of the Utah Department
of Corrections.
(2) (a)  To fulfill the responsibility under Subsection (1), the State Board
of Education and the Utah Department of Corrections shall, where feasible,
contract with appropriate private or public agencies to provide educational
and related administrative services.  Contracts for postsecondary education
and training shall be under Subsection (2)(b).
(b) (i)  The contract under Subsection (2)(a) to provide postsecondary
education and training shall be with a community college if the correctional
facility is located within the service region of a community college, except
under Subsection (2)(b)(ii).
(ii)  If the community college under Subsection (2)(b)(i) declines to provide
the education and training or cannot meet reasonable contractual terms for
providing the education and training as specified by the Utah Department of
Corrections, postsecondary education and training under Subsection (2)(a) may
be procured through other appropriate private or public agencies.
(3) (a)  As its corrections education program, the State Board of Education,
the State Board of Regents, and the Utah Department of Corrections shall
develop and implement a recidivism reduction plan, including the following
components:
(i)  inmate assessment;
(ii)  cognitive problem-solving skills;
(iii)  basic literacy skills;
(iv)  career skills;
(v)  job placement;
(vi)  postrelease tracking and support;
(vii)  research and evaluation;
(viii)  family involvement and support; and
(ix)  multiagency collaboration.
(b)  The plan shall be developed and implemented through the State Office of
Education, the State Board of Regents, and the Utah Department of Corrections
in collaboration with the following entities:
(i)  the Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees;
(ii)  local boards of education;
(iii)  Department of Workforce Services;
(iv)  Department of Human Services;
(v)  Board of Pardons and Parole;
(vi)  State Office of Rehabilitation; and
(vii)  the Governor's Office.
(4)  The department shall make a report to the Education and Law Enforcement
and Criminal Justice Interim Committees on the recidivism reduction plan
before October 1, 2010.
